incubator/apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AĀBCČDEĒFGĢHIĪJKĶLĻMNŅOPRSŠTUŪVZŽaābcčdeēfgģhiījkķlļmnņoprsštuūvzž</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="nom"      c="Nominatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="gen"      c="Ģenitīvs"/>
    <sdef n="abl"/>
    <sdef n="dat"      c="Datīvs"/>
    <sdef n="acc"      c="Akuzatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="ins"/>
    <sdef n="loc"      c="Lokatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="voc"      c="Vokatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="sg"       c="Vienskaitlis"/>
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Daudzskaitlis"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="pres"     c="Tagadne"/>
    <sdef n="past"     c="Pagātne"/>
    <sdef n="fut"      c="Nākotne"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
  </sdefs>
  
  <pardefs>
  
    <pardef n="ap__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vis__pref">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vis</l>
          <r>vis<s n="sup"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ārā__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ļoti__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="klus/i__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āk</l>
          <r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tāl/u__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>āk</l>
          <r>u<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aiz"><i>aiz</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ap"><i>ap</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="apakš"><i>apakš</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ārpus"><i>ārpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bez"><i>bez</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="caur"><i>caur</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cauri"><i>cauri</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dēļ"><i>dēļ</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gar"><i>gar</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="garām"><i>garām</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iekš"><i>iekš</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iekšpus"><i>iekšpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iepretim"><i>iepretim</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iz"><i>iz</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kopš"><i>kopš</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="labad"><i>labad</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="līdz"><i>līdz</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="līdzi"><i>līdzi</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="lejpus"><i>lejpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="otrpus"><i>otrpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="par"><i>par</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pār"><i>pār</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pāri"><i>pāri</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pēc"><i>pēc</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pie"><i>pie</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pirms"><i>pirms</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pret"><i>pret</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pretī"><i>pretī</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="priekš"><i>priekš</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="starp"><i>starp</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="šaipus"><i>šaipus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="uz"><i>uz</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="viņpus"><i>viņpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="virs"><i>virs</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="virspus"><i>virspus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="zem"><i>zem</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ļoti"><i>ļoti</i><par n="ļoti__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ārā"><i>ārā</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="apakšā"><i>apakšā</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="klusi"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>klus</i><par n="klus/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tālu"><par n="vis__pref"/><i>tāl</i><par n="tāl/u__adv"/></e>
